Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 12 Administrative Organization
12.080.
Administrative rules.

The Governor, with the approval of his executive cabinet, may prescribe such general rules for the conduct of the administrative departments as he deems necessary or expedient to give effect to the provisions of law relating to the administrative organization of state agencies. The head of each department may likewise prescribe such rules as he deems expedient for the proper conduct of the work of the department and for making effective the provisions of law, and not inconsistent therewith or with the general rules prescribed by the Governor.

History.

4618-157: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 8.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

Acts, 1976, ch. 206, § 1, provides: “Appointments of citizen at large members of boards and commissions covered by Acts 1976, ch. 206, shall be made when a vacancy occurs upon the board or commission. The governor may, in cases where he deems necessary, delay making a citizen at large appointment until a second vacancy occurs on the board or commission or a second vacancy occurs in a particular category of membership, but in no case shall he delay beyond a second vacancy the making of such appointments.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section, KRS

350.028

and

350.050

provide ample statutory authority authorizing the Department for Natural Resources and Environmental Protection (now Finance and Administration Cabinet) to impose the requirements of 30 C.F.R. part 705, concerning conflicts of interest, on its employees.

OAG 78-335

.

12.090.
Cooperation between departments.

Subject to rules prescribed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet pursuant to law, any agency shall furnish to any other agency such services, labor and materials, as are requisitioned by the head of the other agency, and as its own facilities provide, through the same procedure and subject to the same measures of audit and control as other proposed expense. The expense shall be billed and charged to the agencies served, by transfers between appropriations. Agencies shall, so far as practicable, cooperate with each other in the use of services, quarters and equipment.

History.

4618-158: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 393, § 8, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Kentucky Board of Ophthalmic Dispensers is required to furnish a list of all persons licensed by said Board as requested by the president of the Kentucky Board of Optometric Examiners.

OAG 76-384

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Department of Corrections may contract with other departments for employment of prisoners, KRS

197.120

.

Governor’s Cabinet, cooperation of departments with, KRS

147.070

.

Interstate water sanitation control commissions, state agencies to cooperate with, KRS

224.18-715

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Owsley, The Kentucky Interlocal Cooperation Act, 51 Ky. L.J. 19 (1962).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Ziegler, The Kentucky Open Records Act: A Preliminary Analysis, 7 N. Ky. L. Rev. 7 (1980).

12.100.
Determination of conflicts between agencies.

In all cases where questions arise between agencies as to their respective functions, or where agencies issue conflicting orders or make conflicting rules, the Governor with the advice of the Governor’s Executive Cabinet shall determine the questions, and action shall be taken in accordance with such determination.

History.

4618-159: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 9.

12.110.
Annual and biennial reports.

The Governor shall prepare and submit to the Legislative Research Commission annual reports of the finances and operations of the state and such other reports as the General Assembly may prescribe or as the Governor may desire. The head of each statutory department shall make to the Governor an annual report and may at any time be required by the Governor to make any special report concerning the work under his charge, with his observations and recommendations thereon and pertinent statistics concerning the work of the department, each of which the Governor shall transmit to the Legislative Research Commission online, with such comments as the Governor may desire to make. All such annual reports shall observe the fiscal year of the state as the reporting year, and shall be published only to the extent ordered in writing by the Governor in accordance with KRS

57.390

.

Agencies shall file all annual and biennial reports required by law to be made by agencies with the Governor, and a copy thereof in the office of the Secretary of State, which shall be preserved as a public record.

History.

3956b-1, 4618-160: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 44, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 2011, ch. 42, § 2, effective June 8, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Auditor to report on state fair fund, KRS

247.190

.

Board of Dentistry, report, KRS

313.020

.

Board of Architects, report, KRS

323.210

.

Budget recommendations, KRS Ch. 48.

Secretary of labor, report, KRS

336.160

.

Commissioner of natural resources, report, KRS

351.160

.

Geological survey, reports of, KRS

151.040

.

Governor may employ auditors, KRS

11.070

,

11.090

,

11.100

,

11.110

.

Governor may require information from executive departments and transmit information to General Assembly, Ky. Const., §§ 78, 79.

Governor’s Cabinet, report, KRS

147.090

.

Insurance companies, report on, KRS

299.120

.

Kentucky Horse Racing Authority, report, KRS

230.270

.

Land patents issued, report on, KRS

56.310

.

Printing of reports, KRS

57.011

.

Psychologists, Board of Examiners of, report, KRS

319.030

.

Schools, report on, KRS

156.250

.

Treasurer and auditor, reports on accounts of, Ky. Const., § 53; KRS

43.060

.

Workers’ Compensation Board, annual report to Governor, KRS

342.435

.

12.120.
Power to swear and examine witnesses.

The head of each administrative department and any representative authorized by him may administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath relative to any matter properly subject to inquiry, hearing or investigation in the conduct of the work of the department.

History.

4618-162.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Auditor may require information under oath, KRS

43.080

.

Department of Labor may issue subpoenas, KRS

336.060

.

Governor’s employees may require information under oath, KRS

11.100

.

Legislative Research Commission may subpoena and swear witnesses, KRS

7.110

.

Transportation Cabinet may subpoena witnesses and administer oaths, KRS

183.032

.

Unemployment Insurance Commission may administer oaths, KRS

341.200

.

12.130.
Systematized plan of filing, bookkeeping and accounting.

The Governor shall cause each agency to keep a carefully systematized and well devised plan of filing, bookkeeping and accounting as prescribed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

4618-167: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 10.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Governor may have study or survey of state agencies made, KRS

11.080

to

11.110

.

Unified system of accounts for state, KRS

45.305

.

12.140.
Records are public; inspection; certified copies. [Repealed.]

12.141.
Certified mail, use by state in lieu of registered mail. [Repealed.]

12.145.
Use of certified or registered mail by state agencies — Methods of delivery
for correspondence or notifications.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, an agency of state government shall use certified mail or registered mail only for correspondence or notifications that the Finance and Administration Cabinet determines, by promulgation of administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A, warrant the proof of receipt that those methods of delivery provide. Upon the approval of the Finance and Administrative Cabinet’s administrative regulation, an agency of state government may use any method of governmental, commercial, or electronic delivery for any other correspondence or notification.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 114, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2012, ch. 139, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

12.150.
Department defined. [Repealed.]

12.160.
Administrative departments and agencies may employ attorneys; how employed; compensation. [Repealed.]

12.170.
Powers and duties of attorneys. [Repealed.]

12.180.
Effect on powers and duties of Attorney General. [Repealed.]

12.190.
Reproduction of records or papers by photographic process; use in evidence; destruction of originals. [Repealed.]

12.195.
Destruction or disposal of records; Records Control Board. [Repealed.]

12.200.
Definition for KRS 12.210 to 12.230.

The term “department” as used in KRS

12.210

to

12.230

shall be construed to mean and to include each and every executive or administrative department, program cabinet, division, office and independent agency as said terms are defined and set forth in KRS Chapter 12, and shall include any administrative department, program cabinet, division, office and independent agency heretofore or hereafter designated as such by the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 122, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 11.

12.210.
Power of Governor or state department to employ attorneys — Compensation — Employment by more than one department.

The Governor, or any department with the approval of the Governor, may employ and fix the term of employment and the compensation to be paid to an attorney or attorneys for legal services to be performed for the Governor or for such department. An attorney hired for the collection of revenue owed to the state by a resident shall not be hired by personal service contract. The compensation and expenses of any attorney or attorneys employed under the provisions of this section shall be paid out of the appropriations made to such department as other salaries, compensation and expenses are paid, except when the terms of employment provide that the compensation shall be on a contingent basis, and in such event the attorneys may be paid the amount specified out of the moneys recovered by them or out of the general fund. If the Governor approves the employment, the terms of employment shall be duly entered by executive order upon the executive journal in the Office of the Secretary of State.

An attorney may be employed pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section to render legal services for one (1) or more departments, boards, program cabinets, offices or commissions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 122, § 2; 1960, ch. 68, Art. II, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 12; 1984, ch. 405, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 532, § 7, effective July 14, 2000.

12.211.
Defense of civil action against state employee by Attorney General.

Upon request of an employee or former employee, the Attorney General may provide for the defense of any civil action brought against such employee in his official or individual capacity, or both, on account of an act or omission made in the scope and course of his employment as an employee of the Commonwealth and any of its agencies, except that neither the state, state employee, nor former state employee shall be subject to an action arising from discretionary acts or decisions pertaining to the design or construction of public highways, bridges, or buildings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 362, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The purpose of the State Employees Defense Act, KRS

12.211

to

12.215

, is to assist the Governor in enlisting competent executives for his administration and to provide a means by which an executive sued for some discretionary act may have a legal defense without expending his personal fortune.

OAG 76-565

.

The State Employees Defense Act, KRS

12.211

to

12.215

, does not apply where a child was pushed by an unknown child against the radiator located in the restroom of the Children and Youth Clinic located in the University of Louisville School of Medicine since there was no action against a named state employee and the act does not apply to negligent torts but only to discretionary actions or omissions by a state employee.

OAG 76-565

.

The term “act or omission” as used in this section is a term of art which implies a voluntary, willing act as contrasted with carelessness and negligence.

OAG 76-565

.

Actions for malpractice, such as suits for injury arising from mechanical or ministerial negligence, are not encompassed within the State Employees Defense Act.

OAG 78-31

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Employee Defense Act: Wearing Down Sovereign Immunity, 66 Ky. L.J. 150 (1977-78).

Snell, A Plea for a Comprehensive Liability Statute, 74 Ky. L.J. 521 (1985-86).

12.212.
Attorney General may decline to defend when certain circumstances exist.

The Attorney General may decline to provide for the defense of a civil action brought against an employee or former employee if he determines that:

The act or omission was not within the scope and course of his employment as a state employee; or

The employee or former employee acted or failed to act because of actual fraud, corruption, or actual malice on his part; or

Defense of the action by the Commonwealth would create a conflict of interest between the Commonwealth and the employee or former employee; or

Defense of the action would not be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.

The Attorney General may delegate his authority to make these determinations to the chief administrative authority of any agency, institution, board, or commission whose employees are to be defended.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 362, § 2.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Nothing in 10 KAR 1:010 or this section requires the state to provide for the defense of an employee such as a Property Valuation Administrator.

OAG 91-231

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Employee Defense Act: Wearing Down Sovereign Immunity, 66 Ky. L.J. 150 (1977-78).

Snell, A Plea for a Comprehensive Liability Statute, 74 Ky. L.J. 521 (1985-86).

12.213.
Governor to provide by regulation the methods for defense of state employees.

The Governor shall provide by regulation for the defense of employees or former employees of the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS

12.211

to

12.215

by one (1) or more of the following methods:

By the Attorney General;

By employing other counsel for this purpose as provided for in KRS

12.210

;

By authorizing the purchase of insurance which requires that the insurer provide or underwrite the cost of the defense; or

By authorizing defense by counsel assigned to or employed by the department, agency, board, commission, bureau, or authority which employed the person requesting the defense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 362, § 3; 2000, ch. 532, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Employee Defense Act: Wearing Down Sovereign Immunity, 66 Ky. L.J. 150 (1977-78).

12.214.
Judgments to be paid out of general fund — Settlement of claims. [Repealed.]

12.215.
Expenses incurred by Attorney General to be paid out of general fund.

The expenses incurred by the Attorney General in defending state employees and former state employees shall not be charged against the regular budget of the Attorney General but shall be paid by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet from unappropriated general funds surplus in the State Treasury as a necessary governmental expense on vouchers submitted by the Attorney General and approved by the secretary. The expenses to be so paid include but are not limited to the cost of the time spent by salaried attorneys of the Attorney General’s office, contract attorneys, court reporters, and the cost of trial preparation and investigation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 362, § 5.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, The Employee Defense Act: Wearing Down Sovereign Immunity, 66 Ky. L.J. 150 (1977-78).

12.220.
Authority and duties of employed attorneys — Tax collection — Written opinions.

Any attorney or attorneys employed pursuant to the provisions of KRS

12.210

shall have authority to appear as the attorney for and to represent the department in the trial and argument of any cases and proceedings in any and all courts, and before boards, governmental agencies and tribunals in or out of this Commonwealth whenever such department or any officer or employee thereof is a party in interest or the official rights, powers or duties of the department or of any officer or employee thereof are directly or indirectly affected.

Such attorney or attorneys may institute and prosecute any suits, motions, actions and proceedings necessary to cause the assessment of property, the collection of taxes, and the payment of all claims, accounts, demands and judgments of the Commonwealth, for the assessment or collection of which the department may be charged by law, and to take all necessary steps by suit, motion, action or otherwise to collect or cause to be collected and paid into the State Treasury all such claims, demands, accounts and judgments. Any attorney or attorneys so employed shall attend to any litigation and legal business within and without the state, required of him or them by the terms of his or their employment; and also any litigation or legal business that any officer or employee of such department may have in connection with or growing out of his official duties or the official duties of the department; and he or they, upon the written request of any executive or ministerial officer of the department, shall give such department or officer his written opinion as to the duties of such officer and shall prepare proper drafts of all instruments of writing and perform such other legal services pertaining to the functions of the department as may be provided by the terms of employment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 122, § 3; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 1, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Employment of attorneys to assess property and collect taxes, KRS

134.547

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Note, Constitutionality of the Act Permitting State Departments and Agencies to Employ Attorneys, 31 Ky. L.J. 357 (1943).

12.230.
Effect as to Attorney General and assistants.

KRS

15.020

shall remain in full force and effect, except to the extent the same is in conflict with KRS

12.200

to

12.220

and except to the extent therein provided nothing in those sections shall be construed, nor is the same intended to affect the tenure or compensation of any assistant attorney general appointed and serving pursuant to law. The Governor or any department may require the advice or services of the Attorney General and the assistant attorneys general in matters relating to the duties or functions of any such office or department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 122, § 4; 1968, ch. 152, § 2.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Akers, The Advisory Opinion Function of the Attorney General, 38 Ky. L.J. 561 (1950).

Montague III, The Office of Attorney General in Kentucky, 49 Ky. L.J. 194 (1960).

12.240.
Agreements with agencies of other states — Approval — Limit on expenditures.

The Governor is charged with the conduct of the relations of the Commonwealth with other states and governments. He is empowered to approve agreements between departments or agencies of the Commonwealth, and departments or agencies of other states and governments, for the accomplishment of purposes which are authorized by law to be accomplished in this state by the department or agency entering into the agreement.

No agreement authorized by this section shall involve the expenditure of more than $12,000 in any one (1) year by any one (1) department or agency, except in the case of repairs to interstate bridges. Any such expenditure shall be made from funds already budgeted to the department or agency. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit rights and powers conferred on any department or agency by existing statutes, or by statutes enacted during the 1950 session of the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 213; 1960, ch. 91.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Ferguson, Interstate Agreements, 39 Ky. L.J. 31 (1950).

12.245.
Administrative bodies to issue occupational license, permit, or certificate to members of the United States military, Reserves, or National Guard, veterans, and spouses of members and veterans holding similar license, permit, or certificate from other jurisdictions.

An administrative body that issues a license, permit, certificate, or other document required to operate within a business, profession, or other occupation in the Commonwealth shall issue within thirty (30) days of receipt of a completed application a license, permit, certificate, or other document to a member of the United States military, Reserves, or National Guard, or to his or her spouse, or to a veteran or the spouse of a veteran, who is seeking a license, permit, certificate, or other document and currently holds or recently held equivalent documentation issued by another state, the District of Columbia, or any possession or territory of the United States unless:

The license, permit, certificate, or other document issued by another state, the District of Columbia, or any possession or territory of the United States has been expired for more than two (2) years;

The license, permit, certificate, or other documentation is not in good standing;

The holder of the license, permit, certificate, or other document has had the license, permit, certificate, or other document suspended for disciplinary reasons; or

The board can show substantive evidence of significant statutory deficiency in the training, education, or experience of the United States military service member, Reserves or National Guard member, veteran, or spouse, which could cause a health or safety risk to the public.

The United States military service member, Reserves or National Guard member, veteran, or spouse shall submit:

Proof of issuance of a valid license, permit, certificate, or other document issued by another state, the District of Columbia, or any possession or territory of the United States that is active or has been expired for less than two (2) years;

Proof that the valid license, permit, certificate, or other document issued by another state, the District of Columbia, or any possession or territory of the United States is in good standing or was upon the date of expiration; and

His or her DD-214 form or other proof of active or prior military service with an honorable discharge, discharge under honorable conditions, or a general discharge under honorable conditions.

A United States military service member, Reserves or National Guard member, veteran, or spouse who holds a license, permit, certificate, or other document issued by another state, the District of Columbia, or any possession or territory of the United States who applies for a license, permit, certificate, or other document pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and is denied shall have the right to appeal the decision in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 113, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

12.250.
Program cabinets.

There are established within state government the following program cabinets:

Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

Education and Labor Cabinet.

Public Protection Cabinet.

Transportation Cabinet.

Cabinet for Economic Development.

Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

Finance and Administration Cabinet.

Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet.

Personnel Cabinet.

Energy and Environment Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VII, § 1; 1978, ch. 186, § 20, effective March 29, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 393, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 396, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 414, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 205, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 325, § 21, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 417, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 209, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 48, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 154, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 62, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 9, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 9, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 123, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 9, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 11, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 16, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 9, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 236, § 7, effective July 1, 2022.

12.252.
Public Protection Cabinet — Organizational structure — Appointment of cabinet secretary.

There is established within the Public Protection Cabinet a Department of Financial Institutions, a Department of Insurance, a Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction, a Department of Charitable Gaming, a Department of Professional Licensing, and a Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control. Each department shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor as required by KRS

12.040

and, where appropriate, by KRS

238.510

,

241.015

, and

304.2-020

. Commissioners shall be directly responsible to the secretary and shall perform the functions, powers, and duties provided by law and prescribed by the secretary.

The secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet shall be appointed by the Governor in accordance with KRS

12.255

. The Office of the Secretary shall contain the following entities:

The Office of Communications and Public Outreach, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS

12.050

;

The Office of Legal Services, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS

12.050

and

12.210

;

The Office of Administrative Hearings, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050 and

12.210

; and

The Office of Administrative Services, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050.

There is established within the Public Protection Cabinet the Office of Claims and Appeals pursuant to KRS

49.010

.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission is attached to the Public Protection Cabinet for administrative purposes only, except as provided in KRS

131.330

.

There is established within the Public Protection Cabinet the Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor as required by KRS

12.050

. The executive director shall be directly responsible to the secretary and shall perform the functions, powers, and duties provided by law and prescribed by the secretary.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 24, § 6, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 70, § 21, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 74, § 53, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 178, § 8, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 176, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 185, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.

12.255.
Office of secretary for each program cabinet established.

There is hereby established the office of secretary for each of the program cabinets listed in KRS

12.250

. Each of these program cabinets shall be headed by a secretary appointed by the Governor, each secretary shall be chairman of the related cabinet, and each secretary shall be bonded as required by KRS

62.160

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VII, § 2; 1982, ch. 393, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 396, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 13, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

12.260.
Deputy secretaries in offices of secretary for public protection, for energy and environment, and for education and labor.

There is hereby established in the Office of the Secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet a deputy secretary, appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS

12.050

, who shall be responsible for and engaged in operations of the cabinet and any other duties as assigned by the secretary and, in the absence of the secretary, have authority over cabinet affairs.

There is hereby established in the Office of the Secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet a deputy secretary, appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS

12.050

, who shall be responsible for and engaged in operations of the cabinet and any other duties as assigned by the secretary and, in the absence of the secretary, have authority over cabinet affairs.

There is hereby established in the Office of the Secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet a deputy secretary, appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS

12.050

, who shall be responsible for and engaged in operations of the cabinet and any other duties as assigned by the secretary and, in the absence of the secretary, have authority over cabinet affairs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VII, § 3; 1978, ch. 155, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 13, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 24, § 10, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 236, § 8, effective July 1, 2022.

12.265.
Composition of cabinets.

The cabinets established in KRS

12.250

shall be composed of departments, boards and commissions as set forth in KRS

12.020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VII, § 4; 1976, ch. 299, § 3; 1978, ch. 155, § 5; 1978, ch. 186, § 21; 1980, ch. 141, § 8, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 295, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 393, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 447, § 14, effective April 12, 1982.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1982). This section was amended by two 1982 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

Opinions of Attorney General.

In order to promote greater economy, efficiency and improved administration, the Governor may, by an executive order clearly designating the order as being one relating to reorganization, merge the energy regulatory commission and the utility regulatory commission into one commission.

OAG 80-567

.

The owner of interests in thoroughbred horses can hold an owner’s license to race those horses at Kentucky racetracks and at the same time serve as the Secretary of the Cabinet for Public Protection and Regulation, since the state racing commission as a component of the Cabinet pursuant to this section, is an independent agency of the state government which consists of members appointed by the Governor, but does not include the Secretary; accordingly, there would be no conflict of interest.

OAG 81-385

.

There would be no conflict of interest where the Secretary of the Cabinet for Public Protection and Regulation, created under this section, also owned interests in buildings covered by various state codes generally supervised by the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction under KRS

198B.030

or the Board of Housing, Buildings and Construction under KRS

198B.020

.

OAG 81-385

.

12.267.
Office of developmental planning in department for local government. [Repealed.]

12.270.
Cabinet secretaries — Authority, powers, and duties.

The secretary of each cabinet shall:

Be a member of the Governor’s Cabinet and shall serve as the Governor’s liaison in carrying out the responsibilities for overall direction and coordination of the departments, boards, and commissions included in the related cabinet;

Recommend to the Governor desired reorganization affecting the related cabinet;

Advise the Governor on executive actions, legislative matters, and other steps that may be desirable for better program service;

Evaluate and pass upon all budget requests originated by the departments, boards, and commissions within the related cabinet;

Advise the Governor on the appointment of commissioners and heads of units included in the related cabinet, except for those whose election or selection is otherwise provided for by law.

Each secretary is authorized to accept and expend funds from any source, whether public or private, in support of the duties and responsibilities of the related cabinet.

Each secretary shall have any and all necessary power and authority, subject to appropriate provisions of the statutes, to create such positions and to employ the necessary personnel in such positions to enable the secretary to perform the functions of his office.

Each secretary shall have exclusive control and direction over the administration of the related cabinet programs as required by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VII, § 5; 1992, ch. 13, § 3, effective July 14, 1992.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The authority of a Cabinet Secretary “to accept and expend funds from any source, whether public or private, in support of the duties and responsibilities of the related cabinet” under KRS 12.270(2), is subject to Ky. Const., § 173 and KRS

61.190

(now repealed).

OAG 81-385

.

While this section gives a state cabinet secretary “the responsibilities for overall direction and coordination of the departments, boards and commissions included in the related cabinet,” it in no respect makes the secretary, as such, a member of the departments, boards or commissions he heads, nor does it give the secretary voting authority or direct decision-making power over matters to come before such administrative bodies; accordingly, an individual who is a principal shareholder in a Kentucky national bank, who holds interests in restaurants licenses to sell alcoholic beverages, who holds interests in buildings subject to state codes, and who holds a thoroughbred owner’s license for state race tracks, may be appointed and serve as the Secretary of the Cabinet for public protection and regulation, even though administrative entities within that department regulate those activities.

OAG 81-385

.

12.275.
Judicial advisory council established. [Repealed.]

12.280.
Spindletop foundation. [Repealed.]

12.290.
Accessibility of state government services to deaf or hard-of-hearing persons.

Each department, program cabinet, and administrative body of state government shall promulgate administrative regulations to provide accessibility to all services by persons who are deaf or hard-of-hearing in compliance with federal mandates including 29

U.S.C. sec. 794

, a part of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and 42

U.S.C. secs. 12101

et seq., a part of the Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990. The administrative regulations shall require that interpreter services be provided to persons who are deaf or hard-of-hearing, if those persons make a timely request for the services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 31, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

12.295.
KRS chapters governing organizational units and administrative bodies.

The following organizational units and administrative bodies shall be governed by their respective substantive chapters as set out below:

Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety under KRS Chapter 158;

Council on Postsecondary Education under KRS Chapter 164;

Department of Education under KRS Chapters 156, 157, 158, 161, 163, and 167;

Education Professional Standards Board under KRS Chapter 161;

Kentucky Board of Education under KRS Chapters 156 and 157;

Kentucky Commission on Deaf and Hard of Hearing under KRS Chapter 163; and

Kentucky Educational Television under KRS Chapter 168.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 211, § 169, effective July 12, 2006.